New Jersey, session 221, S2680.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Supreme Court of New Jersey shall issue an order dismissing and recalling any unresolved charges, complaints, and arrest warrants filed with or issued by any municipal court five years or more prior to the date of enactment of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) concerning the following offenses: a.     Petty disorderly persons offenses, as defined in subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:1-4, including but not limited to: (1)  Simple assault committed in a fight or scuffle entered into by mutual consent, as set forth in subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:12-1; (2)  Shoplifting if the value of the merchandise is less than $200, as set forth in paragraph (4) of subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:20-11; (3)  Disorderly conduct, as set forth in N.J.S.2C:33-2; and (4)  Harassment, as set forth in subsections a., b., or c. of N.J.S.2C:33-4; and b.    Disorderly persons offenses, as defined in subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:1-4, including but not limited to: (1)  Simple assault, other than assault committed in a fight or scuffle entered into by mutual consent, as set forth in subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:12-1; (2)  Lewdness, as set forth in subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:14-14; (3)  Bad checks in an amount of less than $200, as set forth in paragraph (4) of subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:21-5; (4)  Obstructing the administration of law or other governmental function other than by obstructing the detection or investigation of a crime or the prosecution of a person for a crime, as set forth in N.J.S.2C:29-1; (5)   Resisting arrest, as set forth in paragraph (1) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:29-2; (6)  Disorderly conduct, as set forth in N.J.S.2C:33-2; (7) Use or possession with intent to use drug paraphernalia, as set forth in N.J.S.2C:36-2; and (8)  Possession of 50 grams or less of marijuana, including any adulterants or dilutants, or five grams or less of hashish, as set forth in paragraph (4) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:35-10. 2.    The dismissal and recall of unresolved charges, complaints, and arrest warrants set forth in P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall not apply to any violation of a municipal ordinance. 3.    Within six months following the effective date of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) the Administrative Office of the Courts shall submit the following reports to the Legislature: a. A study to determine the feasibility of expanding the municipal court conditional dismissal program set forth in P.L.2013, c.158 (C.2C:43-13.1 et al.) and the conditional discharge program set forth in N.J.S.2C:36A-1 to carry out the provisions of section 1 of  P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) in dismissing and recalling unresolved charges, complaints, and arrest warrants; and b.  A study to determine the feasibility of an initiative similar to the federal Fugitive Safe Surrender Program, whereby persons charged with non-violent criminal offenses are encouraged to voluntarily surrender in a faith-based or other neutral setting and seek favorable consideration from the courts. 4.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day following enactment.